Utah statutes.
32A-13-109 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Authority to inspect.
(1)  For purposes of enforcing this title and commission rules, all members of
the commission, authorized representatives of the commission or department, or
any law enforcement or peace officer shall be accorded access, ingress, and
egress to and from all premises or conveyances used in the manufacture,
storage, transportation, service, or sale of any alcoholic product.   They
also may open any package containing, or supposed to contain, any article
manufactured, sold, or exposed for sale, or held in possession with intent to
sell in violation of this title or commission rules, and may inspect its
contents and take samples of the contents for analysis.
(2)  All dealers, clerks, bookkeepers, express agents, railroad and airline
officials, common and other carriers, and their employees shall assist, when
so requested by any authorized person specified in Subsection (1), in tracing,
finding, or discovering the presence of any article prohibited by this title
or commission rules to the extent assistance would not infringe upon the
person's federal and state constitutional rights.
